Alabama, session 2026rs, HB266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Amy Dicks Act.
Section 2. Section 13A-6-24, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§13A-6-24
(a) A person commits the crime of reckless endangerment
if he or she does either of the following:
(1) recklessly Recklessly engages in conduct which that
creates a substantial risk of serious physical injury to
another personindividual.
(2) Recklessly engages in conduct that creates a
substantial risk of serious physical injury to multiple
individuals.
(b)(1) Reckless endangerment A violation of subdivision
(a)(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(2)a. Except as provided in paragraph b., a violation
of subdivision (a)(2) is a Class C felony.
b. A violation of subdivision (a)(2) is a Class B
felony if the person uses a deadly weapon or dangerous
instrument in the commission of the offense."
Page 1

instrument in the commission of the offense."
HB266 Enrolled
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB266 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 26-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 01-Apr-26 Amended and Passed

House 01-Apr-26 Concurred in Senate
Amendment


Page 3